Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB312.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Provisional license" means a license to carry concealed firearms or other deadly weapons issued
pursuant to this section; and
(b) "Standard license" means a license to carry concealed firearms or other deadly weapons issued
pursuant to KRS 237.110.
(2) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall issue provisional licenses to carry concealed firearms or
other deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, to persons who:
(a) Are eighteen (18) years of age but younger than twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 237.110(4)(c), otherwise meet the criteria set forth in KRS 237.110(4) and the
requirements of KRS 237.110(3).
(3) (a) Except as provided in this section, the issuance and regulation of provisional licenses to carry
concealed firearms and deadly weapons shall be governed by KRS 237.110.
(b) Any reference in the Kentucky Revised Statutes to a license issued pursuant to KRS 237.110 shall
also be considered a reference to a provisional license issued pursuant to this section.
(4) A provisional license issued pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Be valid throughout the Commonwealth and, except as provided in other specific sections of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes or federal law, permit the holder of the provisional license to carry
firearms, ammunition, other deadly weapons, or a combination thereof, at any location in the
Commonwealth;
(b) Unless revoked or suspended as provided by law, be valid until the holder turns twenty-one (21) years
of age;
(c) Authorize the holder of the provisional license to carry a concealed firearm, other deadly weapon, or
a combination thereof, on or about his or her person; and
(d) Authorize the holder of the provisional license to carry ammunition for a firearm on or about his or
her person.
(5) A provisional license issued under this section shall be readily distinguishable from a standard license
issued pursuant to KRS 237.110.
(6) (a) Not less than ninety (90) days before the expiration of the provisional license, the Department of
Kentucky State Police shall mail to the holder of the provisional license a written notice of the
expiration and an application to switch from a provisional license to a standard license. The
application to switch from a provisional license to a standard license shall be in a format prescribed
by the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(b) The outside of the envelope shall bear only the name and address of the applicant. No other
information relating to the applicant shall appear on the outside of the envelope sent to the applicant.
(c) The holder of a provisional license may apply for a standard license by:
1. Filing with the sheriff of his or her county of residence the paper application form under this
subsection, or filing with the Department of Kentucky State Police an electronic application
form in lieu of a paper application form;
2. Stating that he or she remains qualified pursuant to the criteria specified in KRS 237.110(3)
and (4); and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Paying an application fee prescribed by the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(d) The sheriff shall issue to the applicant a receipt for the paper application to switch from a provisional
license to a standard license and shall date the receipt. The Department of Kentucky State Police
shall issue to the applicant a receipt for an electronic application to switch from a provisional license
to a standard license and shall date the receipt.
(e) A standard license under KRS 237.110 shall be issued to a qualified applicant upon:
1. Receipt of the completed application to switch from a provisional license to a standard license;
2. Records check as specified in KRS 237.110(3);
3. Determination that the applicant is not ineligible for a standard license as specified in KRS
237.110(4); and
4. Appropriate payment of fees.
Upon issuance of the standard license, the provisional license shall be destroyed by the sheriff.
(f) The holder of a provisional license who fails to submit an application to switch from a provisional
license to a standard license within six (6) months of the expiration of the provisional license shall be
required to submit an application under KRS 237.110.
(g) A standard license issued under this subsection shall not be valid until an applicant is twenty-one
(21) years of age. A provisional licensee who applies for a standard license under this subsection
shall not be required to retake the firearms training described in KRS 237.110(4).
(7) A provisional license which has expired shall be void and shall not be valid for any purpose other than
surrender to the sheriff in exchange for a standard license.
(8) The Department of Kentucky State Police may promulgate any necessary administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to administer this section.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.